Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.207

Restated articles of incorporation.

A domestic corporation may at any time restate its articles of incorporation as theretofore amended, by a resolution adopted by the board of directors.

Upon the adoption of the resolution, restated articles of incorporation shall be executed by the corporation by one of its officers and shall set forth all of the operative provisions of the articles of incorporation as theretofore amended together with a statement that the restated articles of incorporation correctly set forth without change the corresponding provisions of the articles of incorporation as theretofore amended and that the restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.

The restated articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

Upon the filing of the restated articles of incorporation by the secretary of state, the restated articles of incorporation shall become effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210 and shall supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4112; 1982 c 35 s 133.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.